Louisiana, session 2026, HB807.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. The legislature finds that Louisiana's economic competitiveness depends
upon a skilled workforce aligned with high-wage, high-demand industry sectors including
construction, manufacturing, healthcare, transportation and logistics, and information
technology. It further finds that shortages of qualified instructional personnel limit the
ability of the two-year public institutions to scale workforce training programs to meet
employer demand. It is therefore the intent of the Legislature to establish a flexible
Page 1 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 807 ENROLLED
investment program to expand instructor capacity and provide rapid-response capability for
major economic development projects.
Section 2. R.S. 17:1877 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§1877. Workforce Instructor Capacity Investment Program
A. There is hereby established the Workforce Instructor Capacity Investment
Program, hereafter referred to in this Section as the "program", to promote the
expansion of instructional capacity in high-wage, high-demand workforce programs
and support shared instructor models between two-year public institutions and
private sector employers.
B. The program shall be administered by the Board of Supervisors of
Community and Technical Colleges, the Board of Supervisors of Louisiana State
University and Agricultural and Mechanical College, and the Board of Supervisors
of Southern University and Agricultural and Mechanical College, hereafter referred
to in this Section as the "boards". The boards shall promulgate rules in accordance
with the Administrative Procedure Act for the implementation and administration of
this program, including establishing eligibility criteria, cost-sharing models, and
allocation methodologies and defining qualifying industry sectors. Notwithstanding
any provision of law to the contrary, rules promulgated pursuant to the provisions of
this Section shall be submitted to the House Committee on Education, the Senate
Committee on Education, the House Committee on Appropriations, and the Senate
Committee on Finance for oversight. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the
contrary, initial rules for the program may be adopted through the emergency
rulemaking procedure provided for in R.S. 49:962.
C.(1) There is hereby established in the state treasury as a special fund the
Workforce Instructor Capacity Investment Fund, hereafter referred to in this Section
as the "fund". After allocation of money to the Bond Security and Redemption Fund
as provided in Article VII, Section 9(B) of the Constitution of Louisiana, the
treasurer shall deposit into the fund any monies transferred or appropriated by the
legislature and any monies designated for the fund and received or held by the state
treasurer from donations, gifts, grants, or other revenue.
Page 2 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 807 ENROLLED
(2) All unexpended and unencumbered monies in the fund at the end of the
fiscal year shall remain in the fund. The monies in the fund shall be invested by the
state treasurer in the same manner as monies in the state general fund. Interest earned
on the investment of monies in the fund shall be credited to the fund.
(3) Monies in the fund shall be appropriated to the boards for
implementation and administration of the program, including but not limited to any
of the following:
(a) Support of rapid-response instructor deployment tied to major economic
development projects.
(b) Expedited recruitment incentives.
(c) Compensation for temporary or contract-based instructors.
(d) Salary differential supplements.
(e) Accelerated program expansion.
(4) Monies appropriated from the fund shall not be used to displace, replace,
or supplant any state general fund appropriations to public postsecondary education
institutions under the supervision and management of the boards.
(5) The legislature finds that Louisiana faces significant shortages in
healthcare and allied health professions, particularly in rural and undeserved areas,
and that expanding instructor capacity in healthcare programs is critical to meeting
statewide workforce demands.
D. The boards shall submit an annual report no later than forty-five days
prior to the regular session of the legislature to the House Committee on Education,
the Senate Committee on Education, the House Committee on Appropriations, and
the Senate Committee on Finance detailing the amount of funds allocated by the
program, the industry sectors supported, the number of instructors supported, the
number of rapid-response deployments, and the number of credentials produced.
Section 3. This Act shall become effective upon signature by the governor or, if not
signed by the governor, upon expiration of the time for bills to become law without signature
by the governor, as provided by Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Louisiana. If
Page 3 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 807 ENROLLED
vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act shall become
effective on the day following such approval.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 4 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.